Maryland, session 2026, HB1364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
20–115.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Center” means any facility that produces, develops, or
interprets:
1. Screening mammograms; or
2. Diagnostic mammograms.
(ii) “Center” includes a hospital, outpatient department, medical
laboratory, clinic, radiology practice, office of a health care provider, or other testing facility
conducting mammography testing.
(iii) “Center” does not include a facility of the federal Department of
Veterans Affairs.
(3) “Dense breast tissue” means heterogeneously dense or extremely dense
tissue as defined in nationally recognized guidelines or systems for breast imaging
reporting of mammography screening, including the breast imaging reporting and data
system of the American College of Radiology.
– 1 –

Ch. 604 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) “Mammogram” means a radiographic image produced through
mammography.
(5) “Mammography testing” means the imaging of the breast with ionizing
radiation.
(b) On or after July 1, 1992, a person may not perform mammography testing
unless:
(1) The individual performing mammography testing is qualified under
Title 14 of the Health Occupations Article; and
(2) The center where the mammography testing is performed:
(i) Is accredited or has applied for accreditation under the American
College of Radiology Screening Mammography Accreditation Program; and
(ii) Has obtained a certificate of approval from the federal Food and
Drug Administration as specified in the federal Mammography Quality Standards Act of
1992.
(c) (1) (i) This section SUBSECTION does not apply if the federal
Mammography Quality Standards Act of 1992, or regulations adopted under the Act,
requires a notice regarding breast density to be included in the screening results letter that
is sent to a patient.
(ii) This section SUBSECTION may not be construed to:
1. Require a notice regarding breast density to be sent to a
patient that is inconsistent with the provisions of the federal Mammography Quality
Standards Act of 1992, or regulations adopted under the Act; or
2. Create a standard of care, obligation, or duty that provides
a basis for a cause of action.
(2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, a center where
mammography testing is performed shall include in a screening results letter that is sent
to a patient, as required by federal law, the following notice: “This notice contains the
results of your recent mammogram, including information about breast density.
If your mammogram shows that your breast tissue is dense, you should know that
dense breast tissue is a common finding and is not abnormal, with about half of women
having dense or highly dense breasts. However, dense breast tissue can make it harder to
find cancer on a mammogram and may also be associated with an increased risk of cancer.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 604
IF YOUR MAMMOGRAM SHOWS BREAST ARTERIAL CALCIFICATION, YOU
SHOULD KNOW THAT BREAST ARTERIAL CALCIFICATION IS A COMMON FINDING.
HOWEVER, BREAST ARTERIAL CALCIFICATION MAY BE AN INDICATOR OF AN
INCREASED RISK OF CARDIOVASCULAR DISEASE. IF YOU HAVE BREAST ARTERIAL
CALCIFICATIONS, PLEASE DISCUSS THIS WITH YOUR PHYSICIAN TO ASSESS YOUR
CARDIOVASCULAR RISKS AND DETERMINE IF ADDITIONAL TESTING MAY BE
APPROPRIATE FOR YOU.
This information about the result of your mammogram is given to you to raise your
awareness and to inform your conversations with your physician. Together, you can decide
whether additional screening options are right for you based on your mammogram results,
individual risk factors, or physical examination. A report of your results was sent to your
physician.”.
(3) If the Department finds significant differences between the content of
the notice that is required to be provided under paragraph (2) of this subsection and current
medical evidence on breast density, the Department may adopt regulations that change the
content of the notice.
(d) (1) THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO CREATE A
STANDARD OF CARE, OBLIGATION, OR DUTY THAT PROVIDES A BASIS FOR A CAUSE
OF ACTION.
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A CENTER
WHERE MAMMOGRAPHY TESTING IS PERFORMED SHALL INCLUDE IN A SCREENING
RESULTS LETTER THAT IS SENT TO A PATIENT, AS REQUIRED BY FEDERAL LAW, THE
FOLLOWING NOTICE:
“THIS NOTICE CONTAINS THE RESULTS OF YOUR RECENT MAMMOGRAM,
INCLUDING INFORMATION ABOUT BREAST ARTERIAL CALCIFICATION.
IF YOUR MAMMOGRAM SHOWS BREAST ARTERIAL CALCIFICATION, YOU
SHOULD KNOW THAT BREAST ARTERIAL CALCIFICATION IS A COMMON FINDING.
HOWEVER, BREAST ARTERIAL CALCIFICATION MAY BE AN INDICATOR OF AN
INCREASED RISK OF CARDIOVASCULAR DISEASE. IF YOU HAVE BREAST ARTERIAL
CALCIFICATIONS, PLEASE DISCUSS THIS WITH YOUR PHYSICIAN TO ASSESS YOUR
CARDIOVASCULAR RISKS AND DETERMINE IF ADDITIONAL TESTING MAY BE
APPROPRIATE FOR YOU.
THIS INFORMATION ABOUT THE RESULT OF YOUR MAMMOGRAM IS GIVEN TO
YOU TO RAISE YOUR AWARENESS AND TO INFORM YOUR CONVERSATIONS WITH
YOUR PHYSICIAN. TOGETHER YOU CAN DECIDE WHETHER ADDITIONAL SCREENING
OPTIONS ARE RIGHT FOR YOU BASED ON YOUR MAMMOGRAM RESULTS, INDIVIDUAL
– 3 –

Ch. 604 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
RISK FACTORS, OR PHYSICAL EXAMINATION. A REPORT OF YOUR RESULTS WAS SENT
TO YOUR PHYSICIAN.”.
(3) IF THE DEPARTMENT FINDS SIGNIFICANT DIFFERENCES
BETWEEN THE CONTENT OF THE NOTICE THAT IS REQUIRED TO BE PROVIDED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND CURRENT MEDICAL EVIDENCE ON
BREAST ARTERIAL CALCIFICATION, THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS
THAT CHANGE THE CONTENT OF THE NOTICE.
(E) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, the penalty for a violation of
subsection (b) of this section may not exceed $1,000.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 4 –